Nebraska, session 109, LB234.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB234 LB234
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 77-6906, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-6906 Economic redevelopment area means:
(1) An an area in the State of Nebraska in which:
(a) (1) The average rate of unemployment in the area during the
period covered by the most recent federal decennial census or American
Community Survey 5-Year Estimate by the United States Bureau of the
Census is at least one hundred fifty percent of the average rate of
unemployment in the state during the same period; and
(b) (2) The average poverty rate in the area is twenty percent or
more for the federal census tract in the area; and .
(2) Any federal census tract directly adjacent to an area described
in subdivision (1) of this section.
Sec. 2. Original section 77-6906, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-2-